Mississippi, session 2026, SB2594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares that: (a)  Publicly owned properties that have historical, cultural or architectural significance play a critical role in preserving Mississippi's heritage; (b)  Special consideration must be given to properties designated as Mississippi Landmarks as they hold exceptional significance and require strict compliance with federal and state preservation laws; and (c)  It is necessary to consider practical and economic issues while ensuring the preservation of architectural and historical integrity of publicly owned buildings designated as Mississippi Landmarks, especially with regard to buildings located on public university and community college campuses. SECTION 2.  Section 39-7-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 39-7-4.  For the purpose of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply: (a)  "Historical significance" means that quality or qualities associated with events that have made a significant contribution to the broad patterns of state, local or national history, or that quality or qualities associated with the lives of persons significant in local, state or national history. (b) "Architectural significance" means the qualities which embody the distinctive characteristics of type, period or method of construction, or that represent the work of a master, or that possess high artistic value. (c) "Archeological significance" means possessing the quality or qualities which have yielded, or may be likely to yield, information important in Mississippi prehistory or history. (d) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Archives and History. (e)  "Board" means the Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History. (f)  "Agency" means any administrative division of the State of Mississippi, its counties, cities or political subdivisions thereof. (g) "Restoration" means the returning of an object, building, structure or site to a prior condition or to an original historic appearance. (h) "Blight" means a building or area which by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence; inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation or open spaces; high density of population or overcrowding; existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; or any combination of such factors, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency or crime and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare. "Blight" also means a building or area which by reason of the presence of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; predominance of defective or inadequate street layout; faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility or usefulness; unsanitary or unsafe conditions; deterioration of site or other improvements; tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land; the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; having development impaired by airport or transportation noise or other environmental hazards; or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a county, city, public university or community college, or any other political subdivision of the State, inhibits the provisions of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals or welfare in its present condition and use. SECTION 3.  Section 39-7-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 39-7-19.  (1)  The board shall be authorized to issue permits to other state agencies or institutions and to qualified private institutions, companies, or individuals for the taking, salvaging, excavating, restoring, or the conducting of scientific or educational studies at, in or on Mississippi Landmarks as in the opinion of the board would be in the best interest of the State of Mississippi. Such permits may provide for the retaining by the permittee of a portion of any recovery, as set out for contracting parties under Section 39-7-17.  Such permit shall provide for the termination of any rights in the permittee thereunder upon the violation of any of the terms thereof and shall be drafted in compliance with forms approved by the Attorney General.  All such permits shall specify, among other things, the location, nature of the activity, and time period covered thereby.  No person, firm, or corporation shall conduct any such operations on any Mississippi Landmarks without first obtaining and having in his or its possession such permit at the site of such operation, nor shall such operations be conducted in violation of the provisions of such permit. (2)  In the case of buildings or structures located on public university or community college campuses, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the Mississippi Community College Board, as applicable, may, in conjunction with the board, issue permits to their member institutions allowing the demolition of all or portions of designated buildings or structures of historical significance, which have become abandoned, vacant, or blighted and for which the public owner has no current or foreseeable use.  The boards shall issue a permit allowing the demolition of all or portions of designated buildings or structures where it is structurally or economically infeasible to restore.  For the purpose of this section, economically infeasible shall mean the cost to restore exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the replacement value of the building or structure.  Where consideration of total or partial demolition of a currently designated building is requested, the institution where the property is located may be required by the department to provide a structural feasibility study by a licensed structural engineer with experience with historic properties and/or an estimate of cost by a licensed architect or engineer with historic property experience. SECTION 4.  Section 39-7-22, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 39-7-22.  (1)  In the early stages of planning and always prior to the letting of bids for public construction, public improvement of any nature, demolition or the transfer of public property to private ownership, state agencies, local governments and all their political subdivisions, including public universities and community colleges, shall notify the board of the planned action on a form supplied by the board.  The board may survey the affected area, property, structure, or building, to determine if currently designated or potential Mississippi Landmarks will be affected, or if significant sites, buildings, or structures on nonpublic lands will be affected.  No modifications to a currently designated Mississippi Landmark shall take place until a permit including such reasonable conditions as may be required to preserve landmark designation is issued by the relevant boards.  At any time during the review and consideration of a proposed modification to a currently designated Mississippi Landmark, a public owner, including a public university or community college, may appeal any proposed condition of approval to the board of trustees that it believes to be unreasonable, impractical or cost prohibitive.  The department may require such appeal to be in writing and supported by analysis prepared by a licensed architect or engineer with historic property experience. (2)  If the department determines that significant historic, architectural, or archaeological sites, buildings, structures, locations, or remains that are potentially eligible for designation as Mississippi Landmarks will be adversely affected by the public construction * * * or, improvement, demolition or transfer, the proposed public construction * * * or, improvement, demolition or transfer may not be commenced until the department has * * * issued the permit herein required, and has performed all necessary investigations, recording and/or salvage of the site, location or remains.  All investigation, recording and salvage work shall be performed as expeditiously as possible so that no public construction project will be unduly impaired, impeded or delayed submitted notice to the board for consideration of Mississippi Landmark designation.  Should the board decline to so designate, or fail to make such designation within ninety (90) days of the submission of the notice to the department, the proposed public construction, improvement, demolition or transfer may proceed.  If the department recommends landmark designation of a building or structure which a state agency, local government or political subdivision, including a public university or community college, has proposed for total or partial demolition, the department shall provide to the board a structural feasibility study by a licensed structural engineer and an estimate of cost to restore such building or structure to useful condition.  Where such restoration is structurally infeasible or the cost to restore to useful condition would exceed fifty percent (50%) of the replacement value of the building or structure, the department shall not recommend landmark designation to the board. (3)  If in the course of performing public construction * * * or, improvement * * *s, demolition or transfer, historic, prehistoric or archaeological sites, locations, remains or objects are discovered, the department shall be notified and its concurrence shall be requested in continuing the construction * * * or, improvement, demolition or transfer.  Upon receipt of this notice, the department shall survey the area to confirm whether the area contains historic, prehistoric, or archaeological data which should be preserved in the public interest.  The survey shall be conducted as expeditiously as possible.  If, as a result of the survey, it is determined that (a) this data exists in the area, (b) the data has exceptional historic, prehistoric or archaeological significance and should be collected and preserved in the public interest, and (c) it is feasible to collect and preserve the data, the department shall perform the necessary work to collect and preserve the data.  This work shall be performed as expeditiously as possible.  When it is not feasible to collect the data, the agency shall make all reasonable attempts to avoid the site before proceeding. If in the board's opinion the site possesses unusual significance, and is unique to such a degree that the landmark is, or is likely to be, the sole representative of a type or period, the board may prohibit further construction which would destroy or irreparably harm the landmark. SECTION 5.  Section 29-5-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-5-2.  The duties of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be as follows: (a)  (i)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the following state property located in the City of Jackson:  the New State Capitol Building, the Woolfolk State Office Building and Parking Garage, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building, the Walter Sillers Office Building and Parking Garage, the War Veterans' Memorial Building, the Charlotte Capers Building, the William F. Winter Archives and History Building, the Mississippi Museum Complex, the Gulf, Mobile and Ohio Train Depot (GM&O Depot), the Old State Capitol Building, the Governor's Mansion, the Heber Ladner Building, the Robert E. Lee Office Building, the Robert E. Lee Parking Garage, the former Naval Reserve Center, 515 East Amite Street, 620 North Street, 660 North Street, 700 North State Street, 350 High Street, 401 North Lamar Street, 455 North Lamar Street, the State Records Center, the Robert G. Clark, Jr. Building, the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex, the former Central High Building, the Mississippi Workers' Compensation Commission Office Building, as well as all state-owned or leased buildings situated on seat of government property. (ii)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the Dr. Eldon Langston Bolton Building located in Biloxi, Mississippi. (iii)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the State Service Center, located at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and John Merl Tatum Industrial Drive in Hattiesburg, Mississippi. (iv)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition any property purchased, constructed or otherwise acquired by the State of Mississippi for conducting state business and not specifically under the supervision and care by any other state entity, but which is reasonably assumed the department would be responsible for such, as approved by the Public Procurement Review Board, including, but not limited to: 1.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) Shared Services Center and Lockheed Martin Building at Stennis Space Center; 2.  The Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame; 3.  The Mississippi Crafts Center; 4.  The Mississippi Children's Museum; and 5.  The Mississippi Arts and Entertainment Center. (b)  To assign suitable office space for the various state departments, officers and employees who are provided with an office in any of the buildings under the jurisdiction or control of the Department of Finance and Administration.  However, the assignment of space in the New Capitol Building shall be designated by duly passed resolution of the combined Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee, meeting as a joint committee, approved by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives.  A majority vote of the members of the Senate Rules Committee and a majority vote of the members of the House Management Committee shall be required on all actions taken, resolutions or reports adopted, and all other matters considered by the full combined committee on occasions when the Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee shall meet as a full combined committee. (c)  To approve or disapprove with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, any lease or rental agreements by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration, including space necessary for parking to be used by state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building.  In no event shall any employee, officer, department, federally funded agency or bureau of the state be authorized to enter into a lease or rental agreement without prior approval of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Public Procurement Review Board. The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to use architects, engineers, building inspectors and other personnel for the purpose of making inspections as may be deemed necessary in carrying out its duties and maintaining the facilities. This section is not intended to apply to locations for which the Department of Finance and Administration has decided to solicit proposals in accordance with subsection (e) of this section. (d)  To acquire by lease, lease-purchase agreement, or otherwise, as provided in Section 27-104-107, and to assign through the Office of General Services, by lease or sublease agreement from the office, and with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, to any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, appropriate office space in the buildings acquired. (e)  To solicit and approve or disapprove, notwithstanding any rule of law to the contrary, and with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, any lease, use or rental agreement for a charge or other consideration for space not exceeding three thousand (3,000) square feet in any individual building listed in subsection (a) of this section, with a private entry who will provide food and/or catering services for state employees, visitors and the general public. The department shall select the entity using a competitive process which shall be publicly advertised.  In addition to satisfying any other requirements for the Public Procurement Review Board's approval, the department must demonstrate that any agreement entered into under this section will neither result in a net cost to the state, nor impair or impede the function of state agencies at such location. (f)  To retain architects, engineers and other professionals for the purpose of assessment of buildings owned by the state, its institutions, universities and community colleges that are designated as Mississippi Landmarks by the Mississippi Department of Archives and History, acting through its board of trustees, or those that are potentially eligible for such designation. SECTION 6.  Section 39-7-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-11.  (1)  All other sites, objects, buildings, artifacts, implements, and locations of archaeological significance, including, but expressly not limited to, those pertaining to prehistoric and historical American Indian or aboriginal campsites, dwellings, and habitation sites, their artifacts and implements of culture, as well as archaeological sites of every character that are located in, on or under the surface of any lands belonging to the State of Mississippi or to any county, city, or political subdivision of the state, are hereby declared to be Mississippi Landmarks and are the sole property of the State of Mississippi.  Such sites may not be taken, altered, destroyed, salvaged or excavated without a permit from the board or in violation of the terms of such permit. (2)  All other sites, objects, buildings, artifacts, implements, structures and locations of historical or architectural significance located in or under the surface of any lands belonging to the State of Mississippi or to any county, city or political subdivision of the state may be declared to be Mississippi Landmarks by majority vote of the board.  Every Mississippi Landmark shall be so designated based upon its significance within the historical or architectural patterns of a community, a county, the State of Mississippi, or the United States of America.  Upon such action by the board, the designation of the Mississippi Landmark shall be recorded in the deed records of the county in which the landmark is located.  All such designated sites or items located on public lands within the State of Mississippi may not be taken, altered, damaged, destroyed, salvaged, restored, renovated or excavated without a permit from, the board or in violation of the terms of such permit. (3)  All such sites or items located on private lands within the State of Mississippi that have been designated as Mississippi Landmarks as hereinafter provided, may not be taken, altered, damaged, destroyed, salvaged, restored, renovated or excavated without a permit from the board or in violation of the terms of such permit.  Such designation shall be reduced to recordable form sufficiently describing the site so that it may be located and shall be recorded in the deed records of the county in which the landmark is located. SECTION 7.  Section 39-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-13.  Any site located upon private lands which is determined by majority vote of the board to be of sufficient archaeological, historical or architectural significance may be designated by the board as a Mississippi Landmark.  It is specifically provided, however, that no such site shall be so designated upon private land without the written consent of the landowner or landowners in recordable form sufficiently describing the site so that it may be located.  Upon such designation the consent of the landowner shall be recorded in the deed records of the county in which the land is located.  Any such site upon private land shall be marked by at least one (1) marker, approved by the board, bearing the words "Mississippi Landmark" for each five (5) acres of area. SECTION 8.  Section 39-7-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-15.  Upon majority vote of the board any Mississippi Landmark on public or private land may be determined to be of no further historical, archaeological, or architectural significance, or not of sufficient significance to warrant its further classification as such, and upon such determination it may be removed from such designation.  In the case of sites located on private land that have theretofore been designated by instrument of record, the board is authorized to cause to be executed and recorded in the deed records of the county where such site is located an instrument setting out such determination and releasing the site from the provisions thereof. SECTION 9.  Section 39-7-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-17.  The board shall be authorized to enter into contracts with other state agencies or institutions and with qualified private institutions, corporations, or individuals for the discovery and salvage of treasure imbedded in the earth, sunken or abandoned ships or wrecks of the sea, parts thereof and their contents.  Such contracts are to be on forms approved by the Attorney General.  The contracts may provide for fair compensation to the salvager in terms of a percentage of the reasonable cash value of the objects recovered, or at the discretion of the board, of a fair share of the objects recovered.  The amount constituting a fair share shall be determined by the board, taking into consideration the circumstances of each such operation.  The reasonable cash value may be determined by contract provision providing for appraisal by qualified experts or by representatives of the contracting parties and their representative or representatives.  Such contract shall provide for the termination of any right in the salvager or permittee thereunder upon the violation of any of the terms thereof.  Superior title to all objects recovered shall be retained by the State of Mississippi unless and until it is released to the salvager or permittee by the board.  No person, firm, or corporation may conduct such salvage or recovery operation herein described without first obtaining such contract.  All such contracts shall specify, among other things, the location, nature of the activity, and the time period covered thereby, and when executed are to be recorded by the person, firm, or corporation obtaining such contract, in the office of the chancery clerk in the county or counties where such operations are to be conducted, prior to the commencement of such operation. The board shall be authorized to conduct surveys to identify Mississippi Landmarks on or under all lands and waters belonging to the State of Mississippi, or any county, city or political subdivisions of the state and to excavate or study all Mississippi Landmarks.  The board shall be further authorized to identify and excavate historic, architectural, or archaeological sites on private property, however, it is specifically provided that no such survey may be undertaken on private land without consent of the landowner and that no excavation may be undertaken on private land without the landowner's written consent. SECTION 10.  Section 39-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-21.  All salvage or recovery operations described under Section 39-7-17, and all operations conducted under permits set out in Section 39-7-19, must be carried out under the general supervision of the board, in accordance with reasonable rules and regulations adopted by the board, and in such manner that the maximum amount of historic, scientific, archeological, and educational information may be recovered and preserved in addition to the physical recovery of items. The board shall be the legal custodian of all antiquities recovered, and is specifically authorized and empowered to promulgate such rules and regulations and to require such contract or permit conditions as to reasonably effect the purposes of this chapter. SECTION 11.  Section 39-7-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-23.  The board is hereby authorized to expend such sums, from any appropriations hereafter made for such purposes, as it may deem advisable, to purchase from the salvager or permittee such salvager's or permittee's share, or portion thereof, of items recovered which in the opinion of the board should remain the property of the State of Mississippi.  The board is authorized and empowered to accept gifts, grants, devises, and bequests of money, securities, or property to be used in the purchase of such items from the salvager or permittee.  Further, in this respect, the board may enter into contracts or agreements with such persons, firms, corporations, or institutions, as it might choose, whereby such persons, firms, corporations, or institutions, for the privilege of retaining temporary possession of such items, may advance to the board the money necessary to procure from the salvager or permittee such items as the board might determine should remain the property of the State of Mississippi, upon the condition that at any time the board may choose to repay to such person, firm, corporation, or institution such sum so advanced, without interest or additional charge of any kind, it may do so and may recover possession of such items.  During the time these items are in the possession of the person, firm, corporation, or institution advancing the money for the purchase thereof, they shall be available for viewing by the general public without charge or at no more than a nominal admission fee, and such items may not be removed from the State of Mississippi for appraisal, exhibition, or restorative purposes, except upon written authorization of the board. SECTION 12.  Section 39-7-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-25.  The restoration of antiquities for private parties is authorized and shall be under the rules and regulations promulgated by the board, and all costs incurred in such restoration, both real and administrative, shall be paid by the private party. SECTION 13.  Section 39-7-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-27.  No person shall intentionally reproduce, replicate, retouch, rework, or forge any archeological or other object which derives value from its antiquity, with intent to represent the same to be original or genuine and with intent to deceive or offer any such object for sale or exchange. SECTION 14.  Section 39-7-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-29.  No person shall intentionally and knowingly deface any American Indian or aboriginal paintings, hieroglyphics, or other marks or carvings on rock or elsewhere which pertain to early American Indian or aboriginal habitation of the country. SECTION 15.  Section 39-7-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-31.  No person, not being the owner thereof, and without the written consent of the owner, proprietor, lessee, or person in charge thereof, shall enter or attempt to enter upon the lands of another and intentionally injure, disfigure, remove, excavate, damage, take, dig into, or destroy any historical structure, monument, marker, medallion, or artifact, or any prehistoric or historic archaeological site, American Indian or aboriginal remains located in, on or under any private lands within the State of Mississippi.  No person without a permit from the board, and without written permission of the landowner, shall intentionally injure, disfigure, remove, excavate, damage, take, dig into, or destroy any prehistoric or historic American Indian or aboriginal burial. SECTION 16.  Section 39-7-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-33.  It shall be unlawful for any person, not being the owner thereof, and without lawful authority, to willfully injure, disfigure, remove or destroy any historical structure, monument, marker, medallion, or artifact. SECTION 17.  Section 39-7-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-35.  (1)  Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by confinement in jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and confinement.  Each day of continued violation of any provision of this chapter shall constitute a distinct and separate offense for which the offender may be punished. (2)  The board at its discretion may grant a "finder's fee," not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), for the arrest and conviction of any person in violation of this chapter. SECTION 18.  Section 39-7-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-37.  In addition to, and without limiting the other powers of the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi and without altering or waiving any criminal penalty provision of this chapter, the Attorney General shall have the power to bring an action in the name of the State of Mississippi in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin violations or threatened violations of this chapter, and for the return of items taken in violation of the provisions hereof, and for the restoration of alterations made in violation of the provisions hereof.  The venue of such actions shall lie in the county in which the activity sought to be enjoined is alleged to be taking place, or in the county from which the items were taken.  Any citizen in the State of Mississippi shall have the power to bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin violations or threatened violations of this chapter, and for the return of items taken in violation of the provisions hereof.  The venue of such actions shall lie in the county in which the activity sought to be enjoined is alleged to be taking place, or in the county from which the items were taken. SECTION 19.  Section 39-7-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-39.  The chief administrative officers of all state agencies and of all state and local governments are authorized and directed to cooperate with and assist the board and the Attorney General in carrying out the intent of this chapter.  All law enforcement agencies and officers, state and local, are authorized and directed to assist in enforcing and in carrying out the intent of this chapter. SECTION 20.  Section 39-7-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-41.  Records in the possession of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History or any other public body as defined in paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3 which contain information about the location of any specific archaeological site and which in the opinion of any such agency possessing such records would, upon the disclosure thereof, create a substantial risk of damage or destruction to the historical value of such archaeological site or create a substantial risk of damage or destruction to private property rights, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. SECTION 21.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.